Utah statutes.
32B-16-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Applicable fine" means the sum of the following imposed or assessed under this title by the commission for a violation related to a minor:

(a)  a fine; and

(b)  administrative costs of a disciplinary proceeding.

(2)  "Violation related to a minor" means a violation under this title:

(a)  that is, in whole or in part, based on a retail licensee, or staff of the retail licensee:

(i)  selling, offering for sale, or furnishing an alcoholic product to a minor;

(ii)  purchasing or otherwise obtaining an alcoholic product for a minor;

(iii)  permitting a minor to consume an alcoholic product;

(iv)  permitting a minor to gain admittance to an area into which a minor is not permitted under this title; or

(v)  offering or providing employment to a minor that under this title may not be obtained by a minor; and

(b)  if as part of the violation the minor uses proof of age in violation of Chapter 1, Part 4, Proof of Age Act.

